src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_НЮБЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ нюмʼ: 26  ProsSg -(м)на
!! /total=0/
!! нюм’ nyum    нюмд’ nyumt°h   нюв” nyuw°q     нюбе nyubye
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
!EVEN
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Дремʼ ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N:Н1 NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:%^MLenition NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:%^MLenition%>е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;

LEXICON N_МУНО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ муʼ:му 27  ProsSg -мна
!! н /total=2/
!! му’(н) múh	мунд’ múnt°h	мун” mún°q	муно múno
!+N:Н1 NMN_МУНО ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
!! +Pl+Nom +Abs
!! +Sg+Acc, +Sg+Gen, +Sg+Nom,
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кна ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
!! Extra variants
!+N+Pl+Loc:Н1%>кˮна K ;
!+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1:Н1%>кни K ;
!! +Sg+Abl+PxSg1, +N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1, +N+Du+Nom+PxSg1
!! +N+Du+Acc+PxSg1, +N+Du+Gen+PxSg1
!! +N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1, +N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1
!! +N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1
+N:Н1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
!! +Du+Nom
!+N:Н1о MUNO_O ;
+N:но NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:но NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;

LEXICON N_ПОЁ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ поʼ:по 28  ProsSg -мна
!! Yaml: __poyo__
!! ң /total=2/
!! по’(ң) poh	понд’ pont°h	пой” poy°q	поё poyo
!! Sg+Acc+Px2 ja Px3 assimilation -нмд- > -нд-
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
!EVEN
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Дремʼ ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:ё NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:ё NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;
!+N:й PLNOMSUF ;

LEXICON N_ВЫӇО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ выʼ:вы 29  ProsSg -мна /-мана
!! ң /total=16/
!! вы’(ң) wíh	вы̄нд’ wínt°h	вы” wí°q	выңо wíŋo
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
!EVEN
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Дремʼ ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:ӈо NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:ӈо NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;

LEXICON N_ИЛЪЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ илʼ:ил 30   ProsSg -мана
!! Yaml: __ilje__
!! ң /total=13/
!! ил’(ң) yil°h	илӑнд’ yilənt°h	ила” yilə°q	илъе yil°ye
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
!! +Equ, +Equ+Lat
!! +Pred+Acc+PxPl1
!! +Pred+Nom+Px{Du2|Pl1|Pl2}
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
!! +Pred+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
!! +Pred+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
!! +Pred+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, +PxSg3, PxDu. PxPl.
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
!! +Du{+Acc|+Gen|+Nom}
!! +Pl+Dat, +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3, +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3
!! +Pl+Dat+PxSg{1|2}
!! +Sg+Dat{+PxSg{1|2|3}|+PxDu{2|3}|+PxPl{2|3}}
!! +Pl+Abl; +Sg+Abl
!! +Sg+Acc+PxSg2, +PxDu1
!! +Sg+Gen{+PxDu1|+PxPl1|+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg|+PxSg2}
!! +Sg+Nom+PxDu1
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_мана ;
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
!! +Sg+Acc{+PxDu1|+PxPl1}
!! +Sg+Gen+PxDu1
!! +Sg+Nom{PxDu1||PxDu3|+PxPl1|+PxPl3|+PxSg3}
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+{+Aor|+Prt1}+Sc{Du|Pl}{1|2}
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc{Sg1|Sg2}
!! +Sg+Nom{X}+Der/Pr+V+Ind{Y}+ScSg3
!! {X}= +PxSg3, +PxDu1, +PxDu3, +PxPl1, +PxPl3 
!! {Y}= +Aor, +Prt1
!! +Tra
+N:ъе NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:ъе NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмна ;


LEXICON N_НЕНЭЦИЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ненэцьʼ:ненэць 30   ProsSg -мана
!! Yaml: __nyenecyh__
!! ң /total=13/
!! ил’(ң) yil°h	илӑнд’ yilənt°h	ила” yilə°q	илъе yil°ye
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E-SG-NOM ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E-OTHERS ;
!EVEN
+N:аӇ1 NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Дремʼ ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
!! +Pred+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
!! +Pred+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
!! +Pred+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, +PxSg3, PxDu. PxPl.
!! +Equ, +Equ+Lat
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
!! +Du{+Acc|+Gen|+Nom}
!! +Pl+Dat, +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3, +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3
!! +Pl+Dat+PxSg{1|2}
!! +Sg+Dat{+PxSg{1|2|3}|+PxDu{2|3}|+PxPl{2|3}}
!! +Pl+Abl; +Sg+Abl
!! +Sg+Acc+PxSg2
!! +Sg+Gen{+PxPl1|+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg|+PxSg2}
+N:аӇ1 NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кна ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
!+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
!! +Sg+Acc{+PxDu1|+PxPl1}
!! +Sg+Gen+PxDu1
!! +Sg+Nom{PxDu1||PxDu3|+PxPl1|+PxPl3|+PxSg3}
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+{+Aor|+Prt1}+Sc{Du|Pl}{1|2}
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc{Sg1|Sg2}
!! +Sg+Nom{X}+Der/Pr+V+Ind{Y}+ScSg3
!! {X}= +PxSg3, +PxDu1, +PxDu3, +PxPl1, +PxPl3
!! {Y}= +Aor, +Prt1
!! +Tra
+N:ие NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:ие NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмна ;

LEXICON N_ПАХАЁ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ пӑхӑʼ: 31   ProsSg -мна
!! ң /total=2/
!! пӑхӑ’(ң) pəx°h	пӑхӑнд’ pəxənt°h	пӑха” pəxə°q	пӑхӑё pəx°yo
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
!EVEN
+N:аӇ1 NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
!! +Pred+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
!! +Pred+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
!! +Pred+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, +PxSg3, PxDu. PxPl.
!! +Equ, +Equ+Lat
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
!! +Du{+Acc|+Gen|+Nom}
!! +Pl+Dat, +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3, +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3
!! +Pl+Dat+PxSg{1|2}
!! +Sg+Dat{+PxSg{1|2|3}|+PxDu{2|3}|+PxPl{2|3}}
!! +Pl+Abl; +Sg+Abl
!! +Sg+Acc+PxSg2
!! +Sg+Gen{+PxPl1|+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg|+PxSg2}
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_мана ;
+N:°Ӈ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:аӇ1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
!! +Sg+Acc{+PxDu1|+PxPl1}
!! +Sg+Gen+PxDu1
!! +Sg+Nom{PxDu1||PxDu3|+PxPl1|+PxPl3|+PxSg3}
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+{+Aor|+Prt1}+Sc{Du|Pl}{1|2}
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+Sc{Sg1|Sg2}
!! +Sg+Nom{X}+Der/Pr+V+Ind{Y}+ScSg3
!! {X}= +PxSg3, +PxDu1, +PxDu3, +PxPl1, +PxPl3
!! {Y}= +Aor, +Prt1
!! +Tra
+N:ё NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:ё NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмна ;

LEXICON N_СЕРО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ серˮ: 32   ProsSg -мана / -мня
!! /total=16/
!! сер” syer	серт’ syert°h	сер” syer°q	серо syero
+N:Д1 SGDATSUF ;
+N:Д1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
+N:Д1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
+N:Д1 PLNOMSUF ;
+N:Д1 PLACCSUF_О ;

LEXICON N_ТАРЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ тӑрˮ:тар 33   ProsSg -мня
!! /total=0/
!! тӑр” tər	тӑрт’ tərt°h	тӑр” tər°q	тӑре tərye
+N:%^PalVariationД1 NMN_МУНО ; !! Vowel variation
+N:е MUNO_O ;
!+N: NMN_ТАРЕ ;

LEXICON N_МАНСО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мӑнˮ: 34   ProsSg -мна
!! /total=6/
!! мӑн”(с) mən°q	мӑнӑт’ mənət°h	мӑнӑс” mənəs°q	мӑнсо mən°so
!+N:°С1 SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
!+N:С1 SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:°С1 NMN_МУНО ;
+N:°С1о MUNO_O ;
!+N:С1 SGDATSUF ;
!+N:аС1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
!+N:аС1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
!+N:С1 SGPROSSUF ;
!+N:аС1 PLNOMSUF ;
!+N:С1 PLACCSUF_О ;
